Utah statutes.
32A-12-305 (Repealed 07/01/11).   Obstructing an officer making a search or
an official proceeding or investigation.
(1)  A person in or having charge of any premises may not refuse or fail to
admit to the premises or obstruct the entry of any member of the commission,
authorized representative of the commission or department, or any law
enforcement officer who demands entry when acting under this title.
(2)  A person in or having charge of any premises may not interfere with any
of the following who is conducting an investigation under this title at the
premises:
(a)  a member of the commission;
(b)  an authorized representative of the commission or department; or
(c)  any law enforcement officer.
(3)  A person is guilty of a second degree felony if, believing that an
official proceeding or investigation is pending or about to be instituted
under this title, that person:
(a)  alters, destroys, conceals, or removes any writing or record with a
purpose to impair its verity or availability in the proceeding or
investigation; or
(b)  makes, presents, or uses anything that the person knows to be false with
a purpose to deceive any commissioner, department official or employee, law
enforcement official, or other person who may be engaged in a proceeding or
investigation under this title.
